District of Columbia statutes.
31-4435

Repealed

Investments and loans.

Repealed.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1152, ch. 672, ch. III, § 35
Feb. 3, 1938, 52 Stat. 26, ch. 13, § 12
June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 480, ch. 503
July 19, 1954, 68 Stat. 494, ch. 546, § 1
Sept. 21, 1959, 73 Stat. 598, Pub. L. 86-329, § 1
Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 86-731, § 1
Sept. 14, 1961, 75 Stat. 514, Pub. L. 87-245, § 1
Oct. 3, 1962, 76 Stat. 715, Pub. L. 87-739, § 1
Aug. 31, 1964, 78 Stat. 765, Pub. L. 88-566, § 2(a), (b)
Aug. 14, 1973, 87 Stat. 303, Pub. L. 93-89, title II, § 201(3), (4)
Oct. 30, 1981, D.C. Law 4-50, § 2, 28 DCR 4258
June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-141, § 2, 37 DCR 2654
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(k), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(e)(2), 50 DCR 330
1981 Ed., § 35-634.
1973 Ed., § 35-535.

The reference to “§ 3701 et seq. of Title 38, United States Code” appearing in (a)(4)(H) was translated from § 1801 et seq., which originally appeared, as this section was renumbered in the U.S. Code.

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4402.